Illinois, session 104th, HB4431.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-10)  from Ch. 120, par. 439.33-107    Sec. 3-10. Rate of tax. Unless otherwise provided in this 8Section, the tax imposed by this Act is at the rate of 6.25% of 9either the selling price or the fair market value, if any, of 10the tangible personal property, which, on and after January 1, 112025, includes leases of tangible personal property. In all 12cases where property functionally used or consumed is the same 13as the property that was purchased at retail, then the tax is 14imposed on the selling price of the property. In all cases 15where property functionally used or consumed is a by-product 16or waste product that has been refined, manufactured, or 17produced from property purchased at retail, then the tax is 18imposed on the lower of the fair market value, if any, of the 19specific property so used in this State or on the selling price 20of the property purchased at retail. For purposes of this 21Section "fair market value" means the price at which property 22would change hands between a willing buyer and a willing 23seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or sell and   HB4431- 2 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1both having reasonable knowledge of the relevant facts. The 2fair market value shall be established by Illinois sales by 3the taxpayer of the same property as that functionally used or 4consumed, or if there are no such sales by the taxpayer, then 5comparable sales or purchases of property of like kind and 6character in Illinois.7    Beginning on July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, 8with respect to motor fuel, as defined in Section 1.1 of the 9Motor Fuel Tax Law, and gasohol, as defined in Section 3-40 of 10the Use Tax Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%.11    Beginning on August 6, 2010 through August 15, 2010, and 12beginning again on August 5, 2022 through August 14, 2022, 13with respect to sales tax holiday items as defined in Section 143-6 of this Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%. 15    With respect to gasohol, the tax imposed by this Act 16applies to (i) 70% of the proceeds of sales made on or after 17January 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, (ii) 80% of the 18proceeds of sales made on or after July 1, 2003 and on or 19before July 1, 2017, (iii) 100% of the proceeds of sales made 20after July 1, 2017 and prior to January 1, 2024, (iv) 90% of 21the proceeds of sales made on or after January 1, 2024 and on 22or before December 31, 2028, and (v) 100% of the proceeds of 23sales made after December 31, 2028. If, at any time, however, 24the tax under this Act on sales of gasohol is imposed at the 25rate of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% 26of the proceeds of sales of gasohol made during that time.  HB4431- 3 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1    With respect to mid-range ethanol blends, the tax imposed 2by this Act applies to (i) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on 3or after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028 and 4(ii) 100% of the proceeds of sales made thereafter. If, at any 5time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of mid-range 6ethanol blends is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax 7imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales of 8mid-range ethanol blends made during that time. 9    With respect to majority blended ethanol fuel, the tax 10imposed by this Act does not apply to the proceeds of sales 11made on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 122028 but applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales made 13thereafter.14    With respect to biodiesel blends with no less than 1% and 15no more than 10% biodiesel, the tax imposed by this Act applies 16to (i) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on or after July 1, 172003 and on or before December 31, 2018 and (ii) 100% of the 18proceeds of sales made after December 31, 2018 and before 19January 1, 2024. On and after January 1, 2024 and on or before 20December 31, 2030, the taxation of biodiesel, renewable 21diesel, and biodiesel blends shall be as provided in Section 223-5.1. If, at any time, however, the tax under this Act on 23sales of biodiesel blends with no less than 1% and no more than 2410% biodiesel is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax 25imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales of 26biodiesel blends with no less than 1% and no more than 10%   HB4431- 4 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1biodiesel made during that time.2    With respect to biodiesel and biodiesel blends with more 3than 10% but no more than 99% biodiesel, the tax imposed by 4this Act does not apply to the proceeds of sales made on or 5after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 2023. On and 6after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 7taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 8shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1.9    Until July 1, 2022 and from July 1, 2023 through December 1031, 2025, with respect to food for human consumption that is to 11be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 12alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 13use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for 14immediate consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 1%. 15Beginning on July 1, 2022 and until July 1, 2023, with respect 16to food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 17premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 18food consisting of or infused with adult use cannabis, soft 19drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 20consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 0%. On and 21after January 1, 2026, food for human consumption that is to be 22consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 23alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 24use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 25prepared for immediate consumption) is exempt from the tax 26imposed by this Act.   HB4431- 5 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1    With respect to prescription and nonprescription 2medicines, drugs, medical appliances, products classified as 3Class III medical devices by the United States Food and Drug 4Administration that are used for cancer treatment pursuant to 5a prescription, as well as any accessories and components 6related to those devices, modifications to a motor vehicle for 7the purpose of rendering it usable by a person with a 8disability, and insulin, blood sugar testing materials, 9syringes, and needles used by human diabetics, the tax is 10imposed at the rate of 1%. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the 1% 11rate of tax on modifications to a motor vehicle for the purpose 12of rendering the motor vehicle usable by a person with a 13disability applies to tangible personal property that is 14installed in or on a motor vehicle before, during, or after the 15purchase of the motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering the 16motor vehicle usable by a person with a disability; however, 17that 1% rate of tax applies only if the tangible personal 18property is separately itemized on the bill or invoice for the 19sale of the motor vehicle or if the tangible personal property 20is purchased separately from the motor vehicle and is 21separately itemized on a bill or invoice. For the purposes of 22this Section, until September 1, 2009: the term "soft drinks" 23means any complete, finished, ready-to-use, non-alcoholic 24drink, whether carbonated or not, including, but not limited 25to, soda water, cola, fruit juice, vegetable juice, carbonated 26water, and all other preparations commonly known as soft   HB4431- 6 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1drinks of whatever kind or description that are contained in 2any closed or sealed bottle, can, carton, or container, 3regardless of size; but "soft drinks" does not include coffee, 4tea, non-carbonated water, infant formula, milk or milk 5products as defined in the Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk 6Products Act, or drinks containing 50% or more natural fruit 7or vegetable juice.8    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 9beginning September 1, 2009, "soft drinks" means non-alcoholic 10beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft 11drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk 12products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater 13than 50% of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.14    Until August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other 15provisions of this Act, "food for human consumption that is to 16be consumed off the premises where it is sold" includes all 17food sold through a vending machine, except soft drinks and 18food products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 19regardless of the location of the vending machine. Beginning 20August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other provisions of 21this Act, "food for human consumption that is to be consumed 22off the premises where it is sold" includes all food sold 23through a vending machine, except soft drinks, candy, and food 24products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 25regardless of the location of the vending machine. 26    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act,   HB4431- 7 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1beginning September 1, 2009, "food for human consumption that 2is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold" does not 3include candy. For purposes of this Section, "candy" means a 4preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial 5sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or 6other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or 7pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation that contains 8flour or requires refrigeration. 9    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 10beginning September 1, 2009, "nonprescription medicines and 11drugs" does not include grooming and hygiene products. For 12purposes of this Section, "grooming and hygiene products" 13includes, but is not limited to, soaps and cleaning solutions, 14shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan 15lotions and screens, unless those products are available by 16prescription only, regardless of whether the products meet the 17definition of "over-the-counter-drugs". For the purposes of 18this paragraph, "over-the-counter-drug" means a drug for human 19use that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug 20as required by 21 CFR 201.66. The "over-the-counter-drug" 21label includes: 22        (A) a "Drug Facts" panel; or23        (B) a statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a 24    list of those ingredients contained in the compound, 25    substance or preparation.26    Beginning on January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public   HB4431- 8 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1Act 98-122), "prescription and nonprescription medicines and 2drugs" includes medical cannabis purchased from a registered 3dispensing organization under the Compassionate Use of Medical 4Cannabis Program Act. 5    As used in this Section, "adult use cannabis" means 6cannabis subject to tax under the Cannabis Cultivation 7Privilege Tax Law and the Cannabis Purchaser Excise Tax Law 8and does not include cannabis subject to tax under the 9Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. 10    If the property that is purchased at retail from a 11retailer is acquired outside Illinois and used outside 12Illinois before being brought to Illinois for use here and is 13taxable under this Act, the "selling price" on which the tax is 14computed shall be reduced by an amount that represents a 15reasonable allowance for depreciation for the period of prior 16out-of-state use. No depreciation is allowed in cases where 17the tax under this Act is imposed on lease receipts.18(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 19103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 208-15-25.) 21    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 22Section 3-10 as follows: 23    (35 ILCS 110/3-10)24    Sec. 3-10. Rate of tax. Unless otherwise provided in this   HB4431- 9 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1Section, the tax imposed by this Act is at the rate of 6.25% of 2the selling price of tangible personal property transferred, 3including, on and after January 1, 2025, transferred by lease, 4as an incident to the sale of service, but, for the purpose of 5computing this tax, in no event shall the selling price be less 6than the cost price of the property to the serviceman.7    Beginning on July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, 8with respect to motor fuel, as defined in Section 1.1 of the 9Motor Fuel Tax Law, and gasohol, as defined in Section 3-40 of 10the Use Tax Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%.11    With respect to gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax Act, the 12tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 70% of the selling price 13of property transferred as an incident to the sale of service 14on or after January 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, (ii) 80% 15of the selling price of property transferred as an incident to 16the sale of service on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before 17July 1, 2017, (iii) 100% of the selling price of property 18transferred as an incident to the sale of service after July 1, 192017 and before January 1, 2024, (iv) 90% of the selling price 20of property transferred as an incident to the sale of service 21on or after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028, 22and (v) 100% of the selling price of property transferred as an 23incident to the sale of service after December 31, 2028. If, at 24any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of gasohol, 25as defined in the Use Tax Act, is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, 26then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the   HB4431- 10 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1proceeds of sales of gasohol made during that time.2    With respect to mid-range ethanol blends, as defined in 3Section 3-44.3 of the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act 4applies to (i) 80% of the selling price of property 5transferred as an incident to the sale of service on or after 6January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028 and (ii) 7100% of the selling price of property transferred as an 8incident to the sale of service after December 31, 2028. If, at 9any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of mid-range 10ethanol blends is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax 11imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the selling price of 12mid-range ethanol blends transferred as an incident to the 13sale of service during that time.14    With respect to majority blended ethanol fuel, as defined 15in the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act does not apply 16to the selling price of property transferred as an incident to 17the sale of service on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before 18December 31, 2028 but applies to 100% of the selling price 19thereafter.20    With respect to biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use 21Tax Act, with no less than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel, 22the tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 80% of the selling 23price of property transferred as an incident to the sale of 24service on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 252018 and (ii) 100% of the proceeds of the selling price after 26December 31, 2018 and before January 1, 2024. On and after   HB4431- 11 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 2taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 3shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax Act. If, 4at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 5biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with no less 6than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel is imposed at the rate 7of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of 8the proceeds of sales of biodiesel blends with no less than 1% 9and no more than 10% biodiesel made during that time.10    With respect to biodiesel, as defined in the Use Tax Act, 11and biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with more 12than 10% but no more than 99% biodiesel, the tax imposed by 13this Act does not apply to the proceeds of the selling price of 14property transferred as an incident to the sale of service on 15or after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 2023. On 16and after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, 17the taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel 18blends shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax 19Act.20    At the election of any registered serviceman made for each 21fiscal year, for whom the aggregate annual cost price of 22tangible personal property transferred as an incident to the 23sales of service is less than 35%, or 75% in the case of 24servicemen transferring prescription drugs or servicemen 25engaged in graphic arts production, of the aggregate annual 26total gross receipts from all sales of service, the tax   HB4431- 12 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1imposed by this Act shall be based on the serviceman's cost 2price of the tangible personal property transferred as an 3incident to the sale of those services. This election may also 4be made by any serviceman maintaining a place of business in 5this State who makes retail sales from outside of this State to 6Illinois customers but is not required to be registered under 7Section 2a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. Beginning 8January 1, 2026, this election shall not apply to any sale of 9service made through a marketplace that has met the threshold 10in subsection (b-5) of Section 2d of this Act. 11    Beginning January 1, 2026, the tax shall be imposed at the 12rate of 6.25% of 50% of the entire billing to the service 13customer for all sales of service made through a marketplace 14that has met the threshold in subsection (b-5) of Section 2d of 15this Act. In no event shall 50% of the entire billing be less 16than the cost price of the property to the marketplace 17serviceman or the marketplace facilitator on its own sales of 18service. 19    Until July 1, 2022 and from July 1, 2023 through December 2031, 2025, the tax shall be imposed at the rate of 1% on food 21prepared for immediate consumption and transferred incident to 22a sale of service subject to this Act or the Service Occupation 23Tax Act by an entity licensed under the Hospital Licensing 24Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Assisted Living and Shared 25Housing Act, the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the 26Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the   HB4431- 13 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1Child Care Act of 1969, or an entity that holds a permit issued 2pursuant to the Life Care Facilities Act. Until July 1, 2022 3and from July 1, 2023 through December 31, 2025, the tax shall 4also be imposed at the rate of 1% on food for human consumption 5that is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 6than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 7adult use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been 8prepared for immediate consumption and is not otherwise 9included in this paragraph). 10    Beginning on July 1, 2022 and until July 1, 2023, the tax 11shall be imposed at the rate of 0% on food prepared for 12immediate consumption and transferred incident to a sale of 13service subject to this Act or the Service Occupation Tax Act 14by an entity licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act, the 15Nursing Home Care Act, the Assisted Living and Shared Housing 16Act, the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the 17Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the 18Child Care Act of 1969, or an entity that holds a permit issued 19pursuant to the Life Care Facilities Act. Beginning on July 1, 202022 and until July 1, 2023, the tax shall also be imposed at 21the rate of 0% on food for human consumption that is to be 22consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 23alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 24use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for 25immediate consumption and is not otherwise included in this 26paragraph).   HB4431- 14 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1    On and after January 1, 2026, food prepared for immediate 2consumption and transferred incident to a sale of service 3subject to this Act or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an 4entity licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing 5Home Care Act, the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 6ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized 7Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care 8Act of 1969, or by an entity that holds a permit issued 9pursuant to the Life Care Facilities Act is exempt from the tax 10under this Act. On and after January 1, 2026, food for human 11consumption that is to be consumed off the premises where it is 12sold (other than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or 13infused with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food 14that has been prepared for immediate consumption and is not 15otherwise included in this paragraph) is exempt from the tax 16under this Act. 17    The tax shall be imposed at the rate of 1% on prescription 18and nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, 19products classified as Class III medical devices by the United 20States Food and Drug Administration that are used for cancer 21treatment pursuant to a prescription, as well as any 22accessories and components related to those devices, 23modifications to a motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering 24it usable by a person with a disability, and insulin, blood 25sugar testing materials, syringes, and needles used by human 26diabetics. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the 1% rate of tax on   HB4431- 15 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1modifications to a motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering 2the motor vehicle usable by a person with a disability applies 3to tangible personal property that is installed in or on a 4motor vehicle before, during, or after the purchase of the 5motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering the motor vehicle 6usable by a person with a disability; however, that 1% rate of 7tax applies only if the tangible personal property is 8separately itemized on the bill or invoice for the sale of the 9motor vehicle or if the tangible personal property is 10purchased separately from the motor vehicle and is separately 11itemized on a bill or invoice. For the purposes of this 12Section, until September 1, 2009: the term "soft drinks" means 13any complete, finished, ready-to-use, non-alcoholic drink, 14whether carbonated or not, including, but not limited to, soda 15water, cola, fruit juice, vegetable juice, carbonated water, 16and all other preparations commonly known as soft drinks of 17whatever kind or description that are contained in any closed 18or sealed bottle, can, carton, or container, regardless of 19size; but "soft drinks" does not include coffee, tea, 20non-carbonated water, infant formula, milk or milk products as 21defined in the Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk Products Act, 22or drinks containing 50% or more natural fruit or vegetable 23juice.24    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 25beginning September 1, 2009, "soft drinks" means non-alcoholic 26beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft   HB4431- 16 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk 2products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater 3than 50% of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.4    Until August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other 5provisions of this Act, "food for human consumption that is to 6be consumed off the premises where it is sold" includes all 7food sold through a vending machine, except soft drinks and 8food products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 9regardless of the location of the vending machine. Beginning 10August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other provisions of 11this Act, "food for human consumption that is to be consumed 12off the premises where it is sold" includes all food sold 13through a vending machine, except soft drinks, candy, and food 14products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 15regardless of the location of the vending machine. 16    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 17beginning September 1, 2009, "food for human consumption that 18is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold" does not 19include candy. For purposes of this Section, "candy" means a 20preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial 21sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or 22other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or 23pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation that contains 24flour or requires refrigeration. 25    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 26beginning September 1, 2009, "nonprescription medicines and   HB4431- 17 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1drugs" does not include grooming and hygiene products. For 2purposes of this Section, "grooming and hygiene products" 3includes, but is not limited to, soaps and cleaning solutions, 4shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan 5lotions and screens, unless those products are available by 6prescription only, regardless of whether the products meet the 7definition of "over-the-counter-drugs". For the purposes of 8this paragraph, "over-the-counter-drug" means a drug for human 9use that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug 10as required by 21 CFR 201.66. The "over-the-counter-drug" 11label includes: 12        (A) a "Drug Facts" panel; or13        (B) a statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a 14    list of those ingredients contained in the compound, 15    substance or preparation.16    Beginning on January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 17Act 98-122), "prescription and nonprescription medicines and 18drugs" includes medical cannabis purchased from a registered 19dispensing organization under the Compassionate Use of Medical 20Cannabis Program Act. 21    As used in this Section, "adult use cannabis" means 22cannabis subject to tax under the Cannabis Cultivation 23Privilege Tax Law and the Cannabis Purchaser Excise Tax Law 24and does not include cannabis subject to tax under the 25Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. 26    If the property that is acquired from a serviceman is   HB4431- 18 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1acquired outside Illinois and used outside Illinois before 2being brought to Illinois for use here and is taxable under 3this Act, the "selling price" on which the tax is computed 4shall be reduced by an amount that represents a reasonable 5allowance for depreciation for the period of prior 6out-of-state use. No depreciation is allowed in cases where 7the tax under this Act is imposed on lease receipts.8(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 9103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-6, eff. 106-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 12changing Section 3-10 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 115/3-10)14    Sec. 3-10. Rate of tax. Unless otherwise provided in this 15Section, the tax imposed by this Act is at the rate of 6.25% of 16the "selling price", as defined in Section 2 of the Service Use 17Tax Act, of the tangible personal property, including, on and 18after January 1, 2025, tangible personal property transferred 19by lease. For the purpose of computing this tax, in no event 20shall the "selling price" be less than the cost price to the 21serviceman of the tangible personal property transferred. The 22selling price of each item of tangible personal property 23transferred as an incident of a sale of service may be shown as 24a distinct and separate item on the serviceman's billing to   HB4431- 19 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1the service customer. If the selling price is not so shown, the 2selling price of the tangible personal property is deemed to 3be 50% of the serviceman's entire billing to the service 4customer. When, however, a serviceman contracts to design, 5develop, and produce special order machinery or equipment, the 6tax imposed by this Act shall be based on the serviceman's cost 7price of the tangible personal property transferred incident 8to the completion of the contract.9    Beginning on July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, 10with respect to motor fuel, as defined in Section 1.1 of the 11Motor Fuel Tax Law, and gasohol, as defined in Section 3-40 of 12the Use Tax Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%.13    With respect to gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax Act, the 14tax imposed by this Act shall apply to (i) 70% of the cost 15price of property transferred as an incident to the sale of 16service on or after January 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, 17(ii) 80% of the selling price of property transferred as an 18incident to the sale of service on or after July 1, 2003 and on 19or before July 1, 2017, (iii) 100% of the selling price of 20property transferred as an incident to the sale of service 21after July 1, 2017 and prior to January 1, 2024, (iv) 90% of 22the selling price of property transferred as an incident to 23the sale of service on or after January 1, 2024 and on or 24before December 31, 2028, and (v) 100% of the selling price of 25property transferred as an incident to the sale of service 26after December 31, 2028. If, at any time, however, the tax   HB4431- 20 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1under this Act on sales of gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax 2Act, is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by 3this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of sales of gasohol 4made during that time.5    With respect to mid-range ethanol blends, as defined in 6Section 3-44.3 of the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act 7applies to (i) 80% of the selling price of property 8transferred as an incident to the sale of service on or after 9January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028 and (ii) 10100% of the selling price of property transferred as an 11incident to the sale of service after December 31, 2028. If, at 12any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of mid-range 13ethanol blends is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then the tax 14imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the selling price of 15mid-range ethanol blends transferred as an incident to the 16sale of service during that time. 17    With respect to majority blended ethanol fuel, as defined 18in the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act does not apply 19to the selling price of property transferred as an incident to 20the sale of service on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before 21December 31, 2028 but applies to 100% of the selling price 22thereafter.23    With respect to biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use 24Tax Act, with no less than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel, 25the tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 80% of the selling 26price of property transferred as an incident to the sale of   HB4431- 21 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1service on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 22018 and (ii) 100% of the proceeds of the selling price after 3December 31, 2018 and before January 1, 2024. On and after 4January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 5taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 6shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax Act. If, 7at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 8biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with no less 9than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel is imposed at the rate 10of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of 11the proceeds of sales of biodiesel blends with no less than 1% 12and no more than 10% biodiesel made during that time.13    With respect to biodiesel, as defined in the Use Tax Act, 14and biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with more 15than 10% but no more than 99% biodiesel material, the tax 16imposed by this Act does not apply to the proceeds of the 17selling price of property transferred as an incident to the 18sale of service on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before 19December 31, 2023. On and after January 1, 2024 and on or 20before December 31, 2030, the taxation of biodiesel, renewable 21diesel, and biodiesel blends shall be as provided in Section 223-5.1 of the Use Tax Act.23    At the election of any registered serviceman made for each 24fiscal year, for whom the aggregate annual cost price of 25tangible personal property transferred as an incident to the 26sales of service is less than 35%, or 75% in the case of   HB4431- 22 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1servicemen transferring prescription drugs or servicemen 2engaged in graphic arts production, of the aggregate annual 3total gross receipts from all sales of service, the tax 4imposed by this Act shall be based on the serviceman's cost 5price of the tangible personal property transferred incident 6to the sale of those services. This election may also be made 7by a serviceman maintaining a place of business in this State 8who makes retail sales from outside of this State to Illinois 9customers but is not required to be registered under Section 102a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. Beginning January 1, 112026, this election shall not apply to any sale of service made 12through a marketplace that has met the threshold in subsection 13(d) of Section 3 of this Act. 14    Beginning January 1, 2026, the tax shall be imposed at the 15rate of 6.25% of 50% of the entire billing to the service 16customer for all sales of service made through a marketplace 17that has met the threshold in subsection (d) of Section 3 of 18this Act. In no event shall 50% of the entire billing be less 19than the cost price of the property to the marketplace 20serviceman or the marketplace facilitator on its own sales of 21service. 22    Until July 1, 2022 and from July 1, 2023 through December 2331, 2025, the tax shall be imposed at the rate of 1% on food 24prepared for immediate consumption and transferred incident to 25a sale of service subject to this Act or the Service Use Tax 26Act by an entity licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act,   HB4431- 23 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1the Nursing Home Care Act, the Assisted Living and Shared 2Housing Act, the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the 3Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the 4Child Care Act of 1969, or an entity that holds a permit issued 5pursuant to the Life Care Facilities Act. Until July 1, 2022 6and from July 1, 2023 through December 31, 2025, the tax shall 7also be imposed at the rate of 1% on food for human consumption 8that is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 9than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 10adult use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been 11prepared for immediate consumption and is not otherwise 12included in this paragraph).13    Beginning on July 1, 2022 and until July 1, 2023, the tax 14shall be imposed at the rate of 0% on food prepared for 15immediate consumption and transferred incident to a sale of 16service subject to this Act or the Service Use Tax Act by an 17entity licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing 18Home Care Act, the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 19ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized 20Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care 21Act of 1969, or an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant 22to the Life Care Facilities Act. Beginning July 1, 2022 and 23until July 1, 2023, the tax shall also be imposed at the rate 24of 0% on food for human consumption that is to be consumed off 25the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 26food consisting of or infused with adult use cannabis, soft   HB4431- 24 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 2consumption and is not otherwise included in this paragraph). 3    On and after January 1, 2026, food prepared for immediate 4consumption and transferred incident to a sale of service 5subject to this Act or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity 6licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home 7Care Act, the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 8ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized 9Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care 10Act of 1969, or an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant 11to the Life Care Facilities Act is exempt from the tax imposed 12by this Act. On and after January 1, 2026, food for human 13consumption that is to be consumed off the premises where it is 14sold (other than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or 15infused with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food 16that has been prepared for immediate consumption and is not 17otherwise included in this paragraph) is exempt from the tax 18imposed by this Act. 19    The tax shall be imposed at the rate of 1% on prescription 20and nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, 21products classified as Class III medical devices by the United 22States Food and Drug Administration that are used for cancer 23treatment pursuant to a prescription, as well as any 24accessories and components related to those devices, 25modifications to a motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering 26it usable by a person with a disability, and insulin, blood   HB4431- 25 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1sugar testing materials, syringes, and needles used by human 2diabetics. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the 1% rate of tax on 3modifications to a motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering 4the motor vehicle usable by a person with a disability applies 5to tangible personal property that is installed in or on a 6motor vehicle before, during, or after the purchase of the 7motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering the motor vehicle 8usable by a person with a disability; however, that 1% rate of 9tax applies only if the tangible personal property is 10separately itemized on the bill or invoice for the sale of the 11motor vehicle or if the tangible personal property is 12purchased separately from the motor vehicle and is separately 13itemized on a bill or invoice. For the purposes of this 14Section, until September 1, 2009: the term "soft drinks" means 15any complete, finished, ready-to-use, non-alcoholic drink, 16whether carbonated or not, including, but not limited to, soda 17water, cola, fruit juice, vegetable juice, carbonated water, 18and all other preparations commonly known as soft drinks of 19whatever kind or description that are contained in any closed 20or sealed can, carton, or container, regardless of size; but 21"soft drinks" does not include coffee, tea, non-carbonated 22water, infant formula, milk or milk products as defined in the 23Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk Products Act, or drinks 24containing 50% or more natural fruit or vegetable juice.25    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 26beginning September 1, 2009, "soft drinks" means non-alcoholic   HB4431- 26 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft 2drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk 3products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater 4than 50% of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.5    Until August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other 6provisions of this Act, "food for human consumption that is to 7be consumed off the premises where it is sold" includes all 8food sold through a vending machine, except soft drinks and 9food products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 10regardless of the location of the vending machine. Beginning 11August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other provisions of 12this Act, "food for human consumption that is to be consumed 13off the premises where it is sold" includes all food sold 14through a vending machine, except soft drinks, candy, and food 15products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 16regardless of the location of the vending machine. 17    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 18beginning September 1, 2009, "food for human consumption that 19is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold" does not 20include candy. For purposes of this Section, "candy" means a 21preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial 22sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or 23other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or 24pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation that contains 25flour or requires refrigeration. 26    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act,   HB4431- 27 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1beginning September 1, 2009, "nonprescription medicines and 2drugs" does not include grooming and hygiene products. For 3purposes of this Section, "grooming and hygiene products" 4includes, but is not limited to, soaps and cleaning solutions, 5shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan 6lotions and screens, unless those products are available by 7prescription only, regardless of whether the products meet the 8definition of "over-the-counter-drugs". For the purposes of 9this paragraph, "over-the-counter-drug" means a drug for human 10use that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug 11as required by 21 CFR 201.66. The "over-the-counter-drug" 12label includes: 13        (A) a "Drug Facts" panel; or14        (B) a statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a 15    list of those ingredients contained in the compound, 16    substance or preparation.17    Beginning on January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 18Act 98-122), "prescription and nonprescription medicines and 19drugs" includes medical cannabis purchased from a registered 20dispensing organization under the Compassionate Use of Medical 21Cannabis Program Act. 22    As used in this Section, "adult use cannabis" means 23cannabis subject to tax under the Cannabis Cultivation 24Privilege Tax Law and the Cannabis Purchaser Excise Tax Law 25and does not include cannabis subject to tax under the 26Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.   HB4431- 28 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 2103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-6, eff. 36-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 4    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 5by changing Section 2-10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 120/2-10)  from Ch. 120, par. 441-107    Sec. 2-10. Rate of tax. Unless otherwise provided in this 8Section, the tax imposed by this Act is at the rate of 6.25% of 9gross receipts from sales, which, on and after January 1, 102025, includes leases, of tangible personal property made in 11the course of business.12    Beginning on July 1, 2000 and through December 31, 2000, 13with respect to motor fuel, as defined in Section 1.1 of the 14Motor Fuel Tax Law, and gasohol, as defined in Section 3-40 of 15the Use Tax Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%.16    Beginning on August 6, 2010 through August 15, 2010, and 17beginning again on August 5, 2022 through August 14, 2022, 18with respect to sales tax holiday items as defined in Section 192-8 of this Act, the tax is imposed at the rate of 1.25%. 20    Within 14 days after July 1, 2000 (the effective date of 21Public Act 91-872), each retailer of motor fuel and gasohol 22shall cause the following notice to be posted in a prominently 23visible place on each retail dispensing device that is used to 24dispense motor fuel or gasohol in the State of Illinois: "As of   HB4431- 29 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1July 1, 2000, the State of Illinois has eliminated the State's 2share of sales tax on motor fuel and gasohol through December 331, 2000. The price on this pump should reflect the 4elimination of the tax." The notice shall be printed in bold 5print on a sign that is no smaller than 4 inches by 8 inches. 6The sign shall be clearly visible to customers. Any retailer 7who fails to post or maintain a required sign through December 831, 2000 is guilty of a petty offense for which the fine shall 9be $500 per day per each retail premises where a violation 10occurs.11    With respect to gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax Act, the 12tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 70% of the proceeds of 13sales made on or after January 1, 1990, and before July 1, 142003, (ii) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on or after July 151, 2003 and on or before July 1, 2017, (iii) 100% of the 16proceeds of sales made after July 1, 2017 and prior to January 171, 2024, (iv) 90% of the proceeds of sales made on or after 18January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028, and (v) 19100% of the proceeds of sales made after December 31, 2028. If, 20at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 21gasohol, as defined in the Use Tax Act, is imposed at the rate 22of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of 23the proceeds of sales of gasohol made during that time.24    With respect to mid-range ethanol blends, as defined in 25Section 3-44.3 of the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act 26applies to (i) 80% of the proceeds of sales made on or after   HB4431- 30 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2028 and (ii) 2100% of the proceeds of sales made after December 31, 2028. If, 3at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 4mid-range ethanol blends is imposed at the rate of 1.25%, then 5the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of the proceeds of 6sales of mid-range ethanol blends made during that time. 7    With respect to majority blended ethanol fuel, as defined 8in the Use Tax Act, the tax imposed by this Act does not apply 9to the proceeds of sales made on or after July 1, 2003 and on 10or before December 31, 2028 but applies to 100% of the proceeds 11of sales made thereafter.12    With respect to biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use 13Tax Act, with no less than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel, 14the tax imposed by this Act applies to (i) 80% of the proceeds 15of sales made on or after July 1, 2003 and on or before 16December 31, 2018 and (ii) 100% of the proceeds of sales made 17after December 31, 2018 and before January 1, 2024. On and 18after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 19taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 20shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax Act. If, 21at any time, however, the tax under this Act on sales of 22biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with no less 23than 1% and no more than 10% biodiesel is imposed at the rate 24of 1.25%, then the tax imposed by this Act applies to 100% of 25the proceeds of sales of biodiesel blends with no less than 1% 26and no more than 10% biodiesel made during that time.  HB4431- 31 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1    With respect to biodiesel, as defined in the Use Tax Act, 2and biodiesel blends, as defined in the Use Tax Act, with more 3than 10% but no more than 99% biodiesel, the tax imposed by 4this Act does not apply to the proceeds of sales made on or 5after July 1, 2003 and on or before December 31, 2023. On and 6after January 1, 2024 and on or before December 31, 2030, the 7taxation of biodiesel, renewable diesel, and biodiesel blends 8shall be as provided in Section 3-5.1 of the Use Tax Act. 9    Until July 1, 2022 and from July 1, 2023 through December 1031, 2025, with respect to food for human consumption that is to 11be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 12alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 13use cannabis, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for 14immediate consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 1%. 15Beginning July 1, 2022 and until July 1, 2023, with respect to 16food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 17premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 18food consisting of or infused with adult use cannabis, soft 19drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 20consumption), the tax is imposed at the rate of 0%. On and 21after January 1, 2026, food for human consumption that is to be 22consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 23alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 24use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 25prepared for immediate consumption) is exempt from the tax 26imposed by this Act.   HB4431- 32 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1    With respect to prescription and nonprescription 2medicines, drugs, medical appliances, products classified as 3Class III medical devices by the United States Food and Drug 4Administration that are used for cancer treatment pursuant to 5a prescription, as well as any accessories and components 6related to those devices, modifications to a motor vehicle for 7the purpose of rendering it usable by a person with a 8disability, and insulin, blood sugar testing materials, 9syringes, and needles used by human diabetics, the tax is 10imposed at the rate of 1%. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the 1% 11rate of tax on modifications to a motor vehicle for the purpose 12of rendering the motor vehicle usable by a person with a 13disability applies to tangible personal property that is 14installed in or on a motor vehicle before, during, or after the 15purchase of the motor vehicle for the purpose of rendering the 16motor vehicle usable by a person with a disability; however, 17that 1% rate of tax applies only if the tangible personal 18property is separately itemized on the bill or invoice for the 19sale of the motor vehicle or if the tangible personal property 20is purchased separately from the motor vehicle and is 21separately itemized on a bill or invoice. For the purposes of 22this Section, until September 1, 2009: the term "soft drinks" 23means any complete, finished, ready-to-use, non-alcoholic 24drink, whether carbonated or not, including, but not limited 25to, soda water, cola, fruit juice, vegetable juice, carbonated 26water, and all other preparations commonly known as soft   HB4431- 33 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1drinks of whatever kind or description that are contained in 2any closed or sealed bottle, can, carton, or container, 3regardless of size; but "soft drinks" does not include coffee, 4tea, non-carbonated water, infant formula, milk or milk 5products as defined in the Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk 6Products Act, or drinks containing 50% or more natural fruit 7or vegetable juice.8    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 9beginning September 1, 2009, "soft drinks" means non-alcoholic 10beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft 11drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk 12products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater 13than 50% of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.14    Until August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other 15provisions of this Act, "food for human consumption that is to 16be consumed off the premises where it is sold" includes all 17food sold through a vending machine, except soft drinks and 18food products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 19regardless of the location of the vending machine. Beginning 20August 1, 2009, and notwithstanding any other provisions of 21this Act, "food for human consumption that is to be consumed 22off the premises where it is sold" includes all food sold 23through a vending machine, except soft drinks, candy, and food 24products that are dispensed hot from a vending machine, 25regardless of the location of the vending machine. 26    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act,   HB4431- 34 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1beginning September 1, 2009, "food for human consumption that 2is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold" does not 3include candy. For purposes of this Section, "candy" means a 4preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial 5sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or 6other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or 7pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation that contains 8flour or requires refrigeration. 9    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, 10beginning September 1, 2009, "nonprescription medicines and 11drugs" does not include grooming and hygiene products. For 12purposes of this Section, "grooming and hygiene products" 13includes, but is not limited to, soaps and cleaning solutions, 14shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan 15lotions and screens, unless those products are available by 16prescription only, regardless of whether the products meet the 17definition of "over-the-counter-drugs". For the purposes of 18this paragraph, "over-the-counter-drug" means a drug for human 19use that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug 20as required by 21 CFR 201.66. The "over-the-counter-drug" 21label includes: 22        (A) a "Drug Facts" panel; or23        (B) a statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a 24    list of those ingredients contained in the compound, 25    substance or preparation.26    Beginning on January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public   HB4431- 35 -LRB104 17056 HLH 30471 b1Act 98-122), "prescription and nonprescription medicines and 2drugs" includes medical cannabis purchased from a registered 3dispensing organization under the Compassionate Use of Medical 4Cannabis Program Act. 5    As used in this Section, "adult use cannabis" means 6cannabis subject to tax under the Cannabis Cultivation 7Privilege Tax Law and the Cannabis Purchaser Excise Tax Law 8and does not include cannabis subject to tax under the 9Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. 10(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 11103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 128-15-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.